xall/x60/809689-grammalecte-fr-thunderbird/src/content/dictionaries/fr-FR-classic-reform/fr-FR-classic-reform.aff
FLAG long
SFX c3 éser èserions éser
SFX c3 éter èterions éter
SFX c3 étrer ètrerions étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvrerions évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyerions éyer
SFX c3 er eriez er
SFX c3 ébrer èbreriez ébrer
SFX c3 écer èceriez écer
SFX c3 écher ècheriez écher
SFX c3 écrer ècreriez écrer
SFX c3 éder èderiez éder
SFX c3 éger ègeriez éger
SFX c3 égler ègleriez égler
SFX c3 égner ègneriez égner
SFX c3 égrer ègreriez égrer
SFX c3 éguer ègueriez éguer
SFX c3 éler èleriez éler
SFX c3 émer èmeriez émer
SFX c3 éner èneriez éner
SFX c3 éper èperiez éper
SFX c3 équer èqueriez équer
SFX c3 érer èreriez érer
SFX c3 éser èseriez éser
SFX c3 éter èteriez éter
SFX c3 étrer ètreriez étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvreriez évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyeriez éyer
SFX c3 er eraient/s' er
SFX c3 ébrer èbreraient/s' ébrer
SFX c3 écer èceraient/s' écer
SFX c3 écher ècheraient/s' écher
SFX c3 écrer ècreraient/s' écrer
SFX c3 éder èderaient/s' éder
SFX c3 éger ègeraient/s' éger
SFX c3 égler ègleraient/s' égler
SFX c3 égner ègneraient/s' égner
SFX c3 égrer ègreraient/s' égrer
SFX c3 éguer ègueraient/s' éguer
SFX c3 éler èleraient/s' éler
SFX c3 émer èmeraient/s' émer
SFX c3 éner èneraient/s' éner
SFX c3 éper èperaient/s' éper
SFX c3 équer èqueraient/s' équer
SFX c3 érer èreraient/s' érer
SFX c3 éser èseraient/s' éser
SFX c3 éter èteraient/s' éter
SFX c3 étrer ètreraient/s' étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvreraient/s' évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyeraient/s' éyer
SFX c3 er asse/m' [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçasse/m' écer
SFX c3 éger égeasse/m' éger
SFX c3 er asses/t' [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçasses/t' écer
SFX c3 éger égeasses/t' éger
SFX c3 er ât/s' [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçât/s' écer
SFX c3 éger égeât/s' éger
SFX c3 er assions [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçassions écer
SFX c3 éger égeassions éger
SFX c3 er assiez [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçassiez écer
SFX c3 éger égeassiez éger
SFX c3 er assent/s' [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçassent/s' écer
SFX c3 éger égeassent/s' éger
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/t' ébrer
SFX c3 écer èce/t' écer
SFX c3 écher èche/t' écher
SFX c3 écrer ècre/t' écrer
SFX c3 éder ède/t' éder
SFX c3 éger ège/t' éger
SFX c3 égler ègle/t' égler
SFX c3 égner ègne/t' égner
SFX c3 égrer ègre/t' égrer
SFX c3 éguer ègue/t' éguer
SFX c3 éler èle/t' éler
SFX c3 émer ème/t' émer
SFX c3 éner ène/t' éner
SFX c3 éper èpe/t' éper
SFX c3 équer èque/t' équer
SFX c3 érer ère/t' érer
SFX c3 éser èse/t' éser
SFX c3 éter ète/t' éter
SFX c3 étrer ètre/t' étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvre/t' évrer
SFX c3 éyer èye/t' éyer
SFX c3 er ons [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçons écer
SFX c3 éger égeons éger
SFX c3 er ez er
